OL/spell/bg_BG.aff
FLAG long					
SFX	H4	Y	15		
SFX	H4		който	който	.
SFX	H4		който	когото	.
SFX	H4		който	комуто	.
SFX	H4		който	когото	.
SFX	H4		който	която	.
SFX	H4		който	което	.
SFX	H4		който	които	.
SFX	H4		чийто	чийто	.
SFX	H4		чийто	чиято	.
SFX	H4		чийто	чието	.
SFX	H4		чийто	чиито	.
SFX	H4		какъвто	какъвто	.
SFX	H4		какъвто	каквато	.
SFX	H4		какъвто	каквото	.
SFX	H4		какъвто	каквито	.
					
SFX	H5	Y	3		
SFX	H5		нѣкой	нѣкой/H3	.
SFX	H5		нѣчий	нѣчий/H3	.
SFX	H5		нѣкакъвъ	нѣкакъвъ/H3	.
					
SFX	H6	Y	3		
SFX	H6		никой	никой/H3	.
SFX	H6		ничий	ничий/H3	.
SFX	H6		никакъвъ	никакъвъ/H3	.
					
SFX	H7	Y	20		
SFX	H7		всѣкой	всѣкой/H3	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣки	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣкиго	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣкиму	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣки	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣка	.
SFX	H7		всѣки	всѣко	.
SFX	H7		всѣкакъвъ	всѣкакъвъ/H3	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичкия	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичкиятъ	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичкий	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичка	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичката	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичко	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичкото	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всички	.
SFX	H7		всичкия	всичкитѣ	.
SFX	H7		все	все	.
SFX	H7		все	вси	.
SFX	H7		все	вситѣ	.
					
SFX	I0	Y	3		
SFX	I0		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	I0		ъ	а	.
SFX	I0		ъ	ътъ	.
					
SFX	I1	Y	5		
SFX	I1		ъ	ъ	.
SFX	I1		ъ	а	.
SFX	I1		ъ	ътъ	.
SFX	I1		ъ	а	.
SFX	I1		ъ	ата	.
					
SFX	J0	Y	3		
SFX	J0		0	то	.
SFX	J0		0	та	.
SFX	J0		0	тата	.
					
SFX	J1	Y	4		
SFX	J1		ме	ме	.
SFX	J1		ме	мето	.
SFX	J1		ме	мена	.
SFX	J1		ме	мената	.
					
SFX	J2	Y	8		
SFX	J2		о	о	.
SFX	J2		о	ото	.
SFX	J2		о	а	.
SFX	J2		о	ата	.
SFX	J2		о	ета	.
SFX	J2		о	етата	.
SFX	J2		о	еса	.
SFX	J2		о	есата	.
					
SFX	J3	Y	8		
SFX	J3		е	е	.
SFX	J3		е	ето	.
SFX	J3		е	а	.
SFX	J3		е	ата	.
SFX	J3		о	о	.
SFX	J3		о	ото	.
SFX	J3		о	и	.
SFX	J3		о	итѣ	.
					
SFX	J4	Y	6		
SFX	J4		о	о	.
SFX	J4		о	ото	.
SFX	J4		о	а	.
SFX	J4		о	ата	.
SFX	J4		о	ѣ	.
SFX	J4		о	ѣтѣ	.
					
SFX	J5	Y	10		
SFX	J5		о	о	.
SFX	J5		о	ото	.
SFX	J5		о	еса	.
SFX	J5		о	есата	.
SFX	J5		е	е	.
SFX	J5		е	ето	.
SFX	J5		е	ета	.
SFX	J5		е	етата	.
SFX	J5		е	еса	.
SFX	J5		е	есата	.
					
SFX	J6	Y	12		
SFX	J6		ко	ко	.
SFX	J6		ко	кото	.
SFX	J6		ко	чи	.
SFX	J6		ко	читѣ	.
SFX	J6		хо	хо	.
SFX	J6		хо	хото	.
SFX	J6		хо	ши	.
SFX	J6		хо	шитѣ	.
SFX	J6		те	те	.
SFX	J6		те	тето	.
SFX	J6		те	ца	.
SFX	J6		те	цата	.
					
SFX	J7	Y	10		
SFX	J7		е	е	.
SFX	J7		е	ето	.
SFX	J7		е	я	.
SFX	J7		е	ята	.
SFX	J7		мо	мо	.
SFX	J7		мо	мото	.
SFX	J7		мо	мена	.
SFX	J7		мо	мената	.
SFX	J7		мо	менѣ	.
SFX	J7		мо	менѣтѣ	.
					
SFX	J8	Y	1		
SFX	J8		0	то	.
					
//SFX	K0	Y	0		
					
SFX	L0	Y	19		
SFX	L0		а	а	.
SFX	L0		а	ата	.
SFX	L0		а	и	.
SFX	L0		а	итѣ	.
SFX	L0		а	о	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	ецъ	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	еца	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	ецътъ	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	ецо	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	ци	.
SFX	L0		ецъ	цитѣ	.
SFX	L0		ие	ие	.
SFX	L0		ие	ието	.
SFX	L0		ие	ия	.
SFX	L0		ие	ията	.
SFX	L0		о	о	.
SFX	L0		о	ото	.
SFX	L0		о	а	.
SFX	L0		о	ата	.
					
SFX	L1	Y	10		
SFX	L1		ълъ	ълъ	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	лия	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	лиятъ	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	лий	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	ла	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	лата	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	ли	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	литѣ	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	ло	.
SFX	L1		ълъ	лото	.
					
SFX	L2	Y	4		
SFX	L2		лъ	лъ	.
SFX	L2		лъ	ла	.
SFX	L2		лъ	ло	.
SFX	L2		лъ	ли	.
					
SFX	L3	Y	10		
SFX	L3		щъ	щъ	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щия	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щиятъ	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щий	.
SFX	L3		щъ	ща	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щата	.
SFX	L3		щъ	що	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щото	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щи	.
SFX	L3		щъ	щитѣ	.
					
SFX	L4	Y	20		
SFX	L4		нъ	нъ	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ния	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ниятъ	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ний	.
SFX	L4		нъ	на	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ната	.
SFX	L4		нъ	но	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ното	.
SFX	L4		нъ	ни	.
SFX	L4		нъ	нитѣ	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тъ	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тия	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тиятъ	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тий	.
SFX	L4		тъ	та	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тата	.
SFX	L4		тъ	то	.
SFX	L4		тъ	тото	.
SFX	L4		тъ	ти	.
SFX	L4		тъ	титѣ	.
					
PFX	L4	Y	1		
PFX	L4		0	не	.
					
SFX	L5	Y	10		
SFX	L5		лъ	лъ	.
SFX	L5		лъ	лия	.
SFX	L5		лъ	лиятъ	.
SFX	L5		лъ	лий	.
SFX	L5		лъ	ла	.
SFX	L5		лъ	лата	.
SFX	L5		лъ	ло	.
SFX	L5		лъ	лото	.
SFX	L5		лъ	ли	.
SFX	L5		лъ	литѣ	.
					
SFX	M0	Y	45		
SFX	M0		ецъ	ецъ	.
SFX	M0		ецъ	еца	.
SFX	M0		ецъ	ецътъ	.
SFX	M0		ецъ	ецо	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	зъмъ	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	зма	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	змътъ	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	зми	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	змитѣ	.
SFX	M0		зъмъ	зме	.
SFX	M0		инъ	инъ	.
SFX	M0		инъ	ина	.
SFX	M0		инъ	инътъ	.
SFX	M0		инъ	и	.
SFX	M0		инъ	итѣ	.
SFX	M0		инъ	ино	.
SFX	M0		ия	ия	.
SFX	M0		ия	ията	.
SFX	M0		ия	ии	.
SFX	M0		ия	иитѣ	.
SFX	M0		ия	ийо	.
SFX	M0		й	й	.
SFX	M0		й	я	.
SFX	M0		й	ятъ	.
SFX	M0		й	и	.
SFX	M0		й	итѣ	.
SFX	M0		й	ю	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	ълъ	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	ъла	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	ълътъ	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	ли	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	литѣ	.
SFX	M0		ълъ	ъле	.
SFX	M0		ъмъ	ъмъ	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъмъ	ъма	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъмъ	ъмътъ	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъмъ	ми	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъмъ	митѣ	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъмъ	ъме	[^з]ъмъ
SFX	M0		ъръ	ъръ	.
SFX	M0		ъръ	ъра	.
SFX	M0		ъръ	ърътъ	.
SFX	M0		ъръ	ри	.
SFX	M0		ъръ	ритѣ	.
SFX	M0		ъръ	ъре	.
					
SFX	M1	Y	24		
SFX	M1		динъ	динъ	.
SFX	M1		динъ	дина	.
SFX	M1		динъ	динътъ	.
SFX	M1		динъ	да	.
SFX	M1		динъ	дата	.
SFX	M1		динъ	дине	.
SFX	M1		елъ	елъ	.
SFX	M1		елъ	ела	.
SFX	M1		елъ	елътъ	.
SFX	M1		елъ	ли	.
SFX	M1		елъ	литѣ	.
SFX	M1		елъ	еле	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	чинъ	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	чина	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	чинътъ	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	ци	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	цитѣ	.
SFX	M1		чинъ	чино	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ъръ	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ъра	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ърътъ	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ра	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ри	.
SFX	M1		ъръ	ритѣ	.
					
SFX	M2	Y	6		
SFX	M2		ецъ	ецъ	.
SFX	M2		ецъ	еца	.
SFX	M2		ецъ	ецътъ	.
SFX	M2		ецъ	йци	.
SFX	M2		ецъ	йцитѣ	.
SFX	M2		ецъ	ецо	.
					
SFX	M3	Y	5		
SFX	M3		ецъ	ецъ	.
SFX	M3		ецъ	еца	.
SFX	M3		ецъ	ецътъ	.
SFX	M3		ецъ	овце	.
SFX	M3		ецъ	овцетѣ	.
					
SFX	M6	Y	12		
SFX	M6		вецъ	вецъ	.
SFX	M6		вецъ	веца	.
SFX	M6		вецъ	вецътъ	.
SFX	M6		вецъ	ъвци	.
SFX	M6		вецъ	ъвцитѣ	.
SFX	M6		вецъ	вецо	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	лецъ	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	леца	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	лецътъ	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	ълци	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	ълцитѣ	.
SFX	M6		лецъ	лецо	.
					
SFX	M7	Y	6		
SFX	M7		ецъ	ецъ	.
SFX	M7		ецъ	еца	.
SFX	M7		ецъ	ецътъ	.
SFX	M7		ецъ	еци	.
SFX	M7		ецъ	ецитѣ	.
SFX	M7		ецъ	ецо	.
					
//SFX	N0	Y	0		
					
//SFX	N1	Y	0		
					
//SFX	N2	Y	0		
					
//SFX	N3	Y	0		
					
//SFX	N4	Y	0		
					
